New Jersey, session 222, S587.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. 1[At] Upon1 the request of a party 1[who has] to1 an order for 1[visitation] parenting time1 or custody 1[that] which1 provides for the exchange of a minor child, 1the court shall order that1 the exchange 1[shall] of the minor child1 be conducted at a neutral safe exchange zone 1[,]1 established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) or at an exchange site designated by the court. b.    1[If] When a motion to enforce compliance with a parenting time or custody order is filed, the court may order that the exchange of a minor child be conducted at an exchange site designated by the court upon request of a party to the order if1 there has been a history of domestic violence between the parties or if there is a temporary or final restraining order issued pursuant to the Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991, P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et seq.)1[, and at the request of a party to enforce compliance with a visitation or custody order, the court may order an exchange of the minor child at a court approved site]1. 2.    a. Each county sheriff shall designate at least one parking lot at the sheriffs office, or a substation thereof, as a neutral safe exchange zone at which parents who are required to exchange a minor child pursuant to a parenting 1[time-sharing schedule or child] time or1 custody 1[or visitation]1 order may meet to exchange the minor child. b. Each parking lot designated as a neutral safe exchange zone shall: (1) have a sign on the premises to clearly identify the designated area as a neutral safe exchange zone; (2) be accessible 24 hours a day, seven days a week; (3) provide adequate lighting; and (4) maintain an external video surveillance system that records continuously, 24 hours a day, seven days a week. c. The surveillance system, required pursuant to subsection b. of this section, shall have the capability to record the neutral safe exchange zone during both 1the1 day and night, capture and record images clearly, and accurately display the time and date. The county sheriff shall retain the video surveillance recordings or images for at least 45 days. d.    Nothing contained in this act shall hold a county, sheriff, law enforcement officer, or employee thereof 1[,]1 liable for civil damages for any act or omission relating to an incident arising from a meeting to exchange a minor child at a neutral safe exchange zone. 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to each county sheriffs office in this State such funds as shall be necessary for the creation of neutral safe exchange zones in each county in this State. 4.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the 13th month following enactment.